Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2911
Non-treatment-related tasks, defined.

Non-treatment-related tasks means clerical, housekeeping, facility maintenance, or patient transportation services related to the practice of physical therapy.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 129;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,373;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1004.